test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-wayasit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wayasit - ok : # -m animate noun, hoof
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg: wayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl: wayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Loc: wayasitihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: wayasicisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: wayasicisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: wayasicisisihk

     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owayasita
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: owayasitiyiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasitinân
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinaw
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: owayasitiyiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owayasita
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: owayasitiyiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasitinânak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinawak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâwak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: owayasitiyiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasicisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasicisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owayasicisisa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: owayasicisisiyiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasicisisinân
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisisinaw
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisisiwâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owayasicisisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: owayasicisisiyiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasicisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasicisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owayasicisisa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: owayasicisisiyiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasicisisinânak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisisinawak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisisiwâwak
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owayasicisisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: owayasicisisiyiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasitihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: owayasitiyihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasitinânihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasitinâhk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasitiwâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasitiwâwihk 
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: owayasitiyihk

     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasicisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasicisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasicisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: owayasicisisiyihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasicisisinânihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisisinâhk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisisiwâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasicisisiwâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: owayasicisisiyihk
